Washington statutes.
RCW 4.48.130

Notice of trial before referee.

(1) If an action is to be tried by a referee appointed under RCW 4.48.010, at least five days before the date set for the trial the referee shall advise the clerk of the court of the time and place set for the trial. The clerk shall post in a conspicuous place in the courthouse a notice that includes the names of the parties to the action, the time and place set for the trial, the name of the referee, and a statement that the proceeding is being held before a referee agreed to by the parties under chapter 4.48 RCW.

(2) A person interested in attending a trial before a referee appointed under RCW 4.84.010 [ 4.48.010] is entitled to do so as in a trial of a civil action in superior court. Upon request by any person, the referee shall give the person notice of the time and place set for the trial.

[ 1984 c 258 s 523.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.